Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2103
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of the Mental Health Practice Act and elsewhere in the Uniform Credentialing Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 38-2104 to 38-2119 apply.

Laws 1993, LB 669, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,296;

Laws 2007, LB247, § 38;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 722;

Laws 2024, LB605, § 4.